Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 42

Liens of Employers and Employees Under Contract

Cross References.

Laborers' lien for work and labor under written or verbal contract, §18-43-101.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 10: effective on passage.

18-42-101. Contracts for more than one year to be in writing.

A contract for services or labor for a period longer than one (1) year shall not entitle the parties to the benefits of this chapter unless the contract is in writing, signed by the parties, and witnessed by two (2) disinterested witnesses or acknowledged before an officer authorized by law to take an acknowledgment.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 2, p. 176; 1887, No. 78, § 1, p. 108; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6879, 6880; Pope's Dig., §§ 8835, 8836; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-502, 51-503; Acts 2005, No. 917, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment deleted former (b) and made a related change.

18-42-102. Contracts of minors.

(a)

The contract of a minor when approved by the parent having control of the minor, or, in case there is no parent, when approved by his or her guardian, or the contract of a minor over fifteen (15) years of age having neither a parent or guardian shall be binding.

(b)

However, a contract with the minor shall not be for a longer period than one (1) year.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 2, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6881; Pope's Dig., § 8837; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-504.

Publisher's Notes.

This section was held to be superseded as to employment contracts with minors under fourteen years of age by §11-6-104 in Clark v. Arkansas Democrat Co., 242 Ark. 133, 497, 413 S.W.2d 629 (1967).

Cross References.

Age of majority, §9-25-101.

Employment of children, §11-6-101 et seq.

18-42-103. Out-of-state contracts binding.

Contracts made with laborers or employers beyond the limits of this state for labor or services to be performed in this state shall be as binding as if entered into within this state.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 1, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6878; Pope's Dig., § 8834; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-501.

18-42-104. Filing and indexing of contracts.

(a)

A copy of the contract or the original shall be filed in the recorder's office of the proper county. The filing shall be sufficient notice of the existence of the lien.

(b)

No third party shall be prejudiced by the existence of the lien, nor in any manner liable under a provision of this chapter unless a copy of the contract is filed in the recorder's office as provided.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 4, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6883, 6884; Pope's Dig., §§ 8839, 8840; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-506; Acts 2005, No. 917, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment deleted former (b); and redesignated former (a)(1) and (a)(2) as present (a) and (b).

18-42-105. Reservation of lien.

Specific liens are reserved upon so much of the produce raised and articles constructed or manufactured by laborers during their contract as will secure all moneys, the value of all supplies furnished them by the employers, and all wages or shares due the laborer.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 3, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6882; Pope's Dig., § 8838; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-505.

18-42-106. Penalty for fraudulent disposition.

(a)

If either party, before settlement, shall dispose of or appropriate any of the things set forth in §18-42-105 without the consent of the other so as to defraud him or her of the amount due, that party shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) and confined in the county jail not less than one (1) month nor more than six (6) months.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall be so construed as forbidding the laborer from mortgaging so much of his or her crop for necessary supplies as may be equal to his or her interest therein at the time, if the employer having contracted to furnish the supplies fails or refuses to do so.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 3, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6882; Pope's Dig., § 8838; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-505.

18-42-107. Discharge of laborer before expiration of contract.

If any employer, without good cause, shall dismiss a laborer prior to the expiration of his or her contract, unless by agreement, he or she shall be liable to the laborer for the full amount that would have been due him or her at the expiration thereof, and the laborer shall be entitled to the lien provided in §18-42-105 for the enforcement of the liability.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 5, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6885; Pope's Dig., § 8841; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-507.

18-42-108. Abandonment by employee.

If any laborer, without good cause, shall abandon his or her employer before the expiration of his or her contract, he or she shall be liable to his or her employer for the full amount of any account he or she may owe his or her employer and shall forfeit to his or her employer all wages or share of crop due him or her, or which might become due him or her, from his or her employer.

History.

Acts § 1883, No. 96, § 6, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6886; Pope's Dig., § 8842; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-508.

18-42-109. Proceedings to enforce liens.

Proceedings for the enforcement of liens under this chapter are governed in the circuit court by the law regulating mechanics' liens.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 7, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6887; Pope's Dig., § 8843; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-509; Acts 2017, No. 757, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “under this chapter are” for “provided for in this chapter shall be”, and deleted “and before justices of the peace by the law regulating attachments before justices” following “liens” at the end.

18-42-110. Lien of employer on crop when no written contract.

(a)

When no written contract is made under this chapter, the employer shall have a lien upon that portion of the crop going to the employee for any debt incident to making and gathering the crop owing to the employer by the employee without any necessity for recording any contract of writing giving the lien.

(b)(1)

In such case, no mortgage or conveyance of any part of the crop made by the person cultivating the land of another shall have validity unless made with the consent of the employer or owner of the land or crop, and the consent must be endorsed upon the mortgage or conveyance.

(2)

However, no endorsement shall bind the party making it to pay the debt unless expressly so stipulated.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 96, § 9, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6888; Pope's Dig., § 8844; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-510.

Cross References.

Lien of landlord on crop, §18-41-101.